Wisconsin, session 2025, SB687.
do enact as follows:SB687,13Section 1. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB687,2,2171.07 (12) In vitro fertilization credit. (a) Definition. In this section, 2“claimant” means an individual who files a claim under this subsection.SB687,2,83(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, and 4subject to the limitations under this subsection, a claimant may claim as a credit 5against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, the unreimbursed medical expenses that 6the claimant paid in the taxable year for consultations, procedures, and prescribed 7drugs directly related to in vitro fertilization that are incurred by the claimant or 8the claimant’s spouse, not to exceed $5,000 for any taxable year.SB687,2,129(c) Limitations. 1. To claim the credit under this subsection, the amount of a 10claimant’s adjusted gross income may not exceed $100,000 for an individual filing a 11single return, $100,000 for a married individual filing a separate return, or 12$200,000 for married individuals filing a joint return.SB687,2,14132. No amounts may claimed under this subsection for insurance coverage, 14travel, mileage, or lodging.SB687,2,18153. No amounts may claimed under this subsection that are paid through a 16health savings account, medical savings account, health flexible spending 17arrangement, health reimbursement arrangement, or any other similar program 18established under state or federal law.SB687,2,20194. No claimant may claim the same expenses under this subsection that the 20claimant claims under sub. (5) for the same taxable year.SB687,2,22215. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is claimed within 22the time period under s. 71.75 (2).SB687,3,223(d) Administration. 1. In administering this subsection, the department of 24revenue shall make available suitable forms with instructions for claimants, 1including a form that may be included with, or as a part of, the individual income 2tax form.SB687,3,432. Subsection (9e) (d), to the extent that it applies to the credit under that 4subsection, applies to the credit under this subsection.SB687,25Section 2. 71.10 (4) (gt) of the statutes is created to read:SB687,3,6671.10 (4) (gt) In vitro fertilization credit under s. 71.07 (12).SB687,3,77